CIK: 1035267
Company Name: INTUITIVE SURGICAL INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2011-02-01
Accession Number: 0001193125-11-020229


ITEM 1 BUSINESS COMPANY BACKGROUND Intuitive Surgical, Inc. was founded in 1995. We are a Delaware corporation with our corporate headquarters located at 1266 Kifer Road, Sunnyvale, California 94086. Our teleph1 number is (408) 523 2100, and our website address is www.intuitivesurgical.com . In this report, Intuitive Surgical, Intuitive, the Company, we, us, and our refer to Intuitive Surgical, Inc. and its wholly owned subsidiaries. Intuitive , Intuitive Surgical , da Vinci , da Vinci S , da Vinci S HD Surgical System , da Vinci Si , da Vinci Si e HD Surgical System , EndoWrist , Single Site , DVSTAT , and InSite are trademarks of Intuitive Surgical, Inc. We design, manufacture and market da Vinci Surgical Systems, which are advanced surgical systems that we believe represent a new generation of surgery. We believe that this new generation of surgery, which we call da Vinci surgery, is a significant advancement similar in scope to previous generations of surgery open surgery and minimally invasive surgery, or conventional MIS. The da Vinci Surgical System consists of a surgeon console, or consoles, a patient side cart and a high performance vision system. The da Vinci Surgical System translates the surgeon natural hand movements, which are performed on instrument controls at a console, into corresponding micro movements of instruments positi1d inside the patient through small incisions, or ports. We believe that the da Vinci Surgical System provides the surgeon with intuitive control, range of motion, fine tissue manipulation capability and high definition 3 D vision, while simultaneously allowing the surgeons to work through the small ports of MIS. 3 Table of Contents By placing computer enhanced technology between the surgeon and the patient, we believe that the da Vinci Surgical System enables surgeons to deliver higher value minimally invasive surgical procedures to their patients. We model patient value as equal to procedure efficacy invasiveness . Here procedure efficacy is a measure of the success of the surgery in resolving the underlying disease and invasiveness is how disruptive and painful the treatment is itself. When the patient value of robotic surgery is significantly higher than competing treatment options, we have seen that patients will seek out surgeons and hospitals that offer da Vinci procedures, potentially resulting in a local shift of treatment approach and market share. The combination of these local adoptions can drive a disruptive change in the marketplace and can lead to the broad adoption of robotic surgery. These adoptions occur procedure by procedure, and are driven by the relative patient value of da Vinci procedures against alternatives for the same disease state. The da Vinci Surgical System is used to perform surgery across multiple surgical specialties, including urology, gynecology, cardiothoracic surgery, transoral surgery, and general surgery. In March 1997, surgeons using an early prototype of our technology performed the first da Vinci surgery on humans. In the second quarter of 1999, we began selling da Vinci products and services outside the United States. In July 2000, we obtained clearance from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to market our products in the United States for use in general laparoscopic procedures. The following is a chronological summary of our FDA clearances to date July 2000 General laparoscopic procedures March 2001 Non cardiac thoracoscopic procedures May 2001 Prostatectomy procedures November 2002 Cardiotomy procedures July 2004 Cardiac revascularization procedures March 2005 Urologic surgical procedures April 2005 Gynecologic surgical procedures June 2005 Pediatric surgical procedures December 2009 Transoral Otolaryngologic surgical procedures In March 2008 we received clearance in the United States to market our system held cardiac stabilizer and permission to remove the warning in our labeling regarding system use in non arrested heart procedures. During first quarter of 2009, we received clearance to market our da Vinci Si Surgical System in the United States and Europe. In November 2009, we received regulatory (Shonin) approval from the Japanese Ministry of Health, Labor, and Welfare (MHLW) for our da Vinci S System in Japan. During the year ended December 31, 2010, we sold 13 da Vinci S Systems in Japan. These sales were primarily made to early adopters. We are currently focusing our efforts with Johnson & Johnson K.K. Medical Company (Japan) on obtaining specific reimbursement approvals for da Vinci procedures in Japan. If we are not successful in obtaining system wide single procedure reimbursements or obtaining approvals for future products and procedures, then the demand for our products could be limited. We have partnered with the experienced regulatory team from Johnson & Johnson K.K. Medical Company (Japan) in our Japanese regulatory process and are continuing to work with them to meet government requirements. We have partnered with Adachi Co., LTD as our separate independent distribution partner in Japan who is responsible for marketing, selling, and servicing our products in Japan. As of December 31, 2010, we had an installed base of 1,752 da Vinci Surgical Systems. During the year ended December 31, 2010, we estimate that surgeons using our technology completed approximately 278,000 4 Table of Contents surgical procedures of various types in major hospitals throughout the world. Out of those da Vinci procedures performed in 2010, we estimate that approximately 110,000 were da Vinci Hysterectomy (dVH) procedures and approximately 98,000 were da Vinci Prostatectomy (dVP) procedures. We operate our business as 1 segment as defined by generally accepted accounting principles. Our financial results for the 3 years ended December 31, 2010 are discussed in Item 7. Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations and Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data of this Annual Report. da Vinci Surgery Open surgery remains the predominant form of surgery and is still used in almost every area of the body. However, the large incisions required for open surgery create trauma to the patient, resulting in longer hospitalization and recovery times, increased hospitalization costs, and additional pain and suffering. Over the past 2 decades, MIS has reduced trauma to the patient by allowing selected surgeries to be performed through small ports rather than large incisions, often resulting in shorter recovery times, fewer complications and reduced hospitalization costs. MIS has been widely adopted for certain surgical procedures, but it has not been widely adopted within complex surgical procedures. The da Vinci Surgical System enables surgeons to overcome many of the shortcomings of both open surgery and conventional MIS and enables a new generation of surgery, da Vinci Surgery. Surgeons operate while seated comfortably at a console viewing a high resolution, 3 D HD image of the surgical field. This immersive visualization connects the surgeon to the surgical field and the instruments. While seated at the console, the surgeon manipulates instrument controls in a natural manner, just as he or she has been trained to do in open surgery. Our technology is designed to provide surgeons with a range of motion in the surgical field analogous to the motions of a human wrist, while filtering out the tremor inherent in a surgeon hand. In designing our products, we have focused on making our technology as simple as possible to use. Our products are designed to convert a broad range of open surgical and conventional MIS procedures to da Vinci surgery. The da Vinci Surgical System is designed to enable surgeons to improve surgical outcomes while providing patients with the benefits of MIS. We believe that these advantages have begun to facilitate a fundamental change in surgery and that our technology overcomes many of the limitations of existing MIS tools and techniques in the following ways Immersive 3 D Visualization. Our vision system includes a 3 D endoscope with 2 independent vision channels linked to 2 separate color monitors. Our vision system is designed to give surgeons the perception that their hands are immersed in the surgical field even though they are outside the patient body. As a result, we believe that surgeons no longer feel disconnected from the surgical field and the instruments, as they currently do with conventional MIS. In addition, the 3 D High Definition vision system with advanced image processing including edge enhancement and noise reduction provides a brighter and sharper image than any other 3 D endoscope vision system currently available. The da Vinci Surgical System provides visualization of the target anatomy with natural depth of field, enhanced contrast and magnification for more accurate tissue identification and tissue layer differentiation. Improved visualization also enables surgeons to perform delicate tissue handling and dissection with added precision even in confined spaces. This precision may help the surgeon avoid trauma to surrounding structures and tissues such as the neurovascular bundle located near the prostate. Precise and Tremor free Endoscope Control. The InSite system also incorporates our proprietary Navigator camera control technology that allows the surgeon to easily change, move, zoom and rotate his or her field of vision. Endoscope control, provided through the hand controls and foot pedals, provides near seamless transition between views. Surgeons can reposition the surgical camera in an instant with foot controls or zoom in, out, up, down, left and right by moving their hands in the desired direction while maintaining a stable image. Repositioning of the surgeon head at the console does not affect image quality as with other 3 D display systems. The combination of these features offers what we believe is the most advanced surgical vision system available today. 5 Table of Contents Intuitive Instrument Movements. Our technology is designed to directly transform the surgeon natural hand movements outside the body into corresponding micro movements inside the patient body. For example, with the da Vinci Surgical System, a hand movement to the right outside the body causes the instrument inside the patient to be moved to the right. In contrast, conventional MIS instruments are essentially long rigid levers that rotate around a fulcrum, or pivot point, located at the port created in the body wall. In conventional MIS, the instrument tip moves in the opposite direction from the surgeon hand and surgeons must adjust their hand eye coordination to translate their hand movements in this backward environment. EndoWrist Instruments Provide Natural Dexterity and Range of Motion. Our technology is designed to provide surgeons with a range of motion in the surgical field analogous to the motions of a human hand and wrist and enable more widespread use of advanced techniques as well as a reduced learning curve when compared to conventional MIS techniques. The surgeon controls the instrument movements from the surgeon console using natural hand and wrist movements. Our proprietary instruments, which we call EndoWrist instruments, incorporate wrist joints that enable surgeons to reach behind tissues and suture with precision, just as they can in open surgery. Added instrument range of motion enhances access and safety while operating in the confined space of the closed chest, abdomen or pelvis. EndoWrist joints are located near the tips of all of our instruments. Conventional MIS instruments provide surgeons less flexibility, dexterity and range of motion than their own hands provide in open surgical procedures. For example, conventional MIS instruments in widespread use today do not have joints near their tips, and cannot replicate a surgeon hand and wrist movements to perform manipulations, such as reaching behind tissue, suturing and fine dissection. More Precise, Tremor reduced Movement. With our technology, the surgeon can also use motion scaling, a feature that translates, for example, a 3 millimeter hand movement outside the patient body into a 1 millimeter instrument movement in the surgical field inside the patient body. Motion scaling is designed to allow greater precision than is normally achievable in either open surgery or conventional MIS. In addition, our technology provides the filtering of tremor inherent in a surgeon hands. Superior Surgeon Ergonomics. The da Vinci Surgical System is designed to allow surgeons to operate while seated, which is not only more comfortable, but also may be clinically advantageous due to reduced surgeon fatigue. The da Vinci Surgical System design provides natural hand to eye alignment at the surgeon console, which provides improved ergonomics over traditional laparoscopic technology. Since the da Vinci Surgical System robotic arms hold the camera and instruments steady, there is less surgeon assistance required and reduced surgeon fatigue and also potentially reduced abdominal wall torque. Improved Ease of Use shortens learning curves. We have designed our products to make them as simple as possible to use, even though the underlying technology is inherently complex. We believe that tissue manipulations using our products are as natural as hand movements in open surgery. In our experience, based on feedback from surgeons who have performed thousands of procedures, surgeons can learn to manipulate our instruments with less training than is typically required for the surgeon to become skilled in conventional MIS. The time required to learn to perform surgical procedures using the da Vinci Surgical System varies depending on the complexity of the procedure and the surgical team experience with MIS techniques. Multi Specialty Surgical Platform. The da Vinci Surgical System is designed to enable surgeons to perform a wide range of surgical procedures. To date, we believe surgeons have used the da Vinci Surgical System to perform nearly 100 different types of surgical procedures. We believe that these technological advantages provide the patient with benefits of reduced trauma while restoring to the surgeon the 3D visualization, range of motion and fine tissue control consistent with open surgery. We believe that our technology has the potential to change surgical procedures in 2 basic ways Convert a Large Percentage of Open Procedures to da Vinci Surgery . We believe that our technology has the potential to convert a large percentage of open procedures which are traditionally performed through large incisions to da Vinci surgery. 6 Table of Contents Facilitate Difficult MIS Operations. We believe that several surgical procedures that are performed only rarely today using conventional MIS techniques can be performed routinely using da Vinci surgery. Some procedures have been adapted for MIS techniques but are extremely difficult and are currently performed by a limited number of highly skilled surgeons. We believe our da Vinci Surgical System will enable more surgeons at more institutions to perform these procedures. Intuitive Surgical Products Using the da Vinci Surgical System During a procedure, the patient side cart is positi1d next to the operating table with the electromechanical arms arranged to provide access to the initial ports selected by the surgeon. Once the ports have been placed by the surgeon, the arms of the da Vinci Surgical System are positi1d and the EndoWrist instruments are introduced into the patient body. The surgeon then performs the procedure while sitting comfortably at the surgeon console, manipulating the instrument controls and viewing the operation through our high performance 3 D vision system. When a surgeon needs to change an instrument, as is d1 many times during an operation, the instrument is withdrawn from the surgical field using the controls at the console, in similar fashion to the way a surgeon withdraws instruments from the patient in conventional MIS. A scrub nurse standing near the patient removes the instrument from the electromechanical arm and replaces it with another instrument, in a process designed to be rapid enough not to disturb the natural flow of the procedure. As a result, the scrub nurse plays a role similar to that played in open surgery and conventional MIS. At the conclusion of the operation, the small port incisions are closed with either suture or band aids. Our principal products include 3 models of da Vinci Surgical System da Vinci Si Surgical System, da Vinci S Surgical System and standard da Vinci Surgical System, along with a variety of EndoWrist instruments and accessories. da Vinci Surgical System Our da Vinci Surgical System is comprised of the following comp1nts Surgeon Console or Consoles. The da Vinci Surgical System allows 1 or 2 surgeons to operate while comfortably seated at an ergonomic console viewing a 3 D image of the surgical field. The surgeon fingers grasp the instrument controls below the display with hands naturally positi1d relative to his or her eyes. Using electronic hardware, software, algorithms, mechanics and optics, our technology translates the surgeon hand movements into precise and corresponding real time micro movements of the EndoWrist instruments positi1d inside the patient. Patient Side Cart. The patient side cart, which can be easily moved next to the operating table, holds electromechanical arms that manipulate the instruments inside the patient. Up to four arms attached to the cart can be easily positi1d as appropriate, and then locked into place. The first 2 arms, 1 representing the left hand and 1 representing the right hand of the surgeon, hold our EndoWrist instruments. The third arm positions the endoscope, allowing the surgeon to easily move, zoom and rotate his or her field of vision. The fourth arm provides additional surgical capabilities by holding an additional EndoWrist instrument as well as potentially reducing the need for an assistant surgeon. The surgeon has a choice of simultaneously controlling any 2 of the operating arms by tapping a foot pedal underneath the surgeon console. The fourth instrument arm extends surgical capabilities by enabling the surgeon to add a third EndoWrist instrument and perform additional tasks such as applying counter traction and following running sutures. The fourth instrument arm is a standard integrated feature on the da Vinci Si and da Vinci S surgical systems and is available as a field upgrade on 3 arm standard da Vinci and 3 arm da Vinci S Surgical Systems. 3 D Vision System . Our vision system includes our InSite 3 D endoscope with 2 separate vision channels linked to 2 separate color monitors through high performance video cameras and specialized edge enhancement and noise reduction equipment. The resulting 3 D image has high 7 Table of Contents resolution and contrast and no flicker or cross fading, which sometimes occurs in single monitor systems, and minimizes eye fatigue. Our HD vision system provides at least 20% more viewing area and enhances visualization of tissue planes and critical anatomy compared with our standard vision system. The digital zoom feature in the 3 D HD vision system allows surgeons to magnify the surgical field of view without adjusting endoscope position and reduces interference between the endoscope and instruments. The 3 D HD vision is a standard integrated feature on da Vinci S Surgical Systems sold today and as an upgrade option to our existing customers who own a da Vinci S Surgical System without HD vision. Our newest da Vinci model, the da Vinci Si , was launched in April 2009. The da Vinci Si System retains and builds on the core technology at the heart of the existing da Vinci and da Vinci S Systems. The da Vinci Si brings to market 3 significant innovations. First, our InSite imaging system has been substantially redesigned for increased visual acuity and improved ease of use. The HD imaging system increased performance is similar to the move from 720p to 1080i in commercial television. We believe that the increased visual performance will continue to enhance surgeon precision and confidence, which may contribute to improved patient outcomes and shorter procedure times. Additionally, the da Vinci Si surgeon user interface has been redesigned to allow simplified and integrated control of the da Vinci Surical System including the ability to set and recall individual surgeon preferred ergonomic and visualization settings. We believe the simplified interface may allow for easier surgeon training. The third significant enhancement is the introduction of a second surgeon console, which we envision to be used in 2 possible ways to provide assistance to the primary surgeon during surgery, or, to be used as an active aid during surgeon student training sessions. With the da Vinci Si , a surgeon sitting at a second console can view the same surgery as the primary surgeon and can be passed control of some or all of the da Vinci instruments during a case. In addition, the surgeons can control 3D virtual pointers to augment the dual surgeon experience. We believe the dual console configuration could both shorten the learning curve for new surgeons and will allow for collaborative surgery in complex cases. In the third quarter of 2010, we introduced the new Si e model of the da Vinci Surgical System. The 3 arm Si e System is designed to deliver core da Vinci functionality, providing a flexible, capable and economical solution for many robotic assisted procedures. The da Vinci Si e system is fully upgradeable to the da Vinci Si model by adding a fourth arm (third instrument arm), and other enhancements. During the year ended December 31, 2010, we sold 9 da Vinci Si e systems. In the fourth quarter of 2010, we introduced the da Vinci Skills Simulator. The simulator is a practice tool which will begin shipping in early 2011 for the da Vinci Si Surgical System that gives a user the opportunity to practice his or her facility with the surgeon console controls. The simulator incorporates 3 dimensional, physics based computer simulation technology to immerse the user within a virtual environment. The user navigates through the environment and completes exercises by controlling virtual instruments from the surgeon console. The suite of exercises includes novice, intermediate, and advanced levels. Upon completion of a skills exercise, the simulator provides a quantitative assessment of user performance based on a variety of task specific metrics. The Skills Simulator is intended to augment, not replace, existing training programs for the da Vinci Si Surgical System. EndoWrist Instruments, Accessories and Vision Comp1nts We manufacture a variety of EndoWrist instruments, each of which incorporates wrist joints for natural dexterity, with tips customized for various surgical procedures. EndoWrist instruments are offered in both 5mm and 8mm diameter sizes. The instruments mount onto the electromechanical arms that represent the surgeon left and right hands and provide the mechanical capability necessary for performing complex tissue manipulations through ports. At their tips, the various EndoWrist instruments include forceps, scissors, electrocautery, scalpels and other surgical tools that are familiar to the surgeon from open surgery and 8 Table of Contents conventional MIS. Generally, a variety of EndoWrist instruments are selected and used interchangeably during a surgery. Where instrument tips need to incorporate a disposable comp1nt, such as scalpel blades, we sell disposable inserts. We plan to continue to add new types of EndoWrist instruments for additional types of surgical procedures. The EndoWrist instruments are sterilizable and most are reusable for a defined number of procedures. A programmed memory chip inside each instrument performs several functions that help determine how the system and instruments work together. When an EndoWrist instrument is attached to an arm of the patient side cart, the chip performs an electronic handshake that ensures the instrument was manufactured by us and communicates the type and function of the instrument and number of past uses. For example, the chip distinguishes between scissors and a scalpel and controls the unique functions of different instruments as appropriate. In addition, the chip will not allow the instrument to be used for more than the prescribed number of procedures so that its performance meets specifications during each procedure. We also sell various vision and accessory products, which are used in conjunction with the da Vinci Surgical System as surgical procedures are performed. Accessory products include sterile drapes used to ensure a sterile field during surgery, vision products such as replacement 3 D stereo endoscopes, camera heads, light guides, and other miscellaneous Item. Existing da Vinci S instruments and most da Vinci S accessories are compatible with the da Vinci Si system. Our Objective Our objective is to bring the benefits of minimally invasive surgery to as many patients as possible. Our priorities to accomplish this are as follows 1 Patient Value. We believe that the value of a surgical procedure to a patient can be defined as Patient Value = Efficacy Invasiveness. Most patients will place higher value on procedures that are not only more efficacious, but also less invasive than alternative treatments. Our goal is to provide patients with procedure options that are both highly effective and less invasive than other surgical options. 2 Key Procedures. We believe that the adoption of da Vinci surgery occurs based upon the patient value it brings to each surgical procedure. We therefore focus our development efforts on those procedures to which we believe our products bring the highest patient value. We currently focus on five surgical specialties urologic surgery, gynecologic surgery, cardiothoracic surgery, general surgery and head and neck surgery. In 2010, the mix of procedures performed with the da Vinci Surgical System among these five surgical specialties was largest within gynecology, followed by urology, cardiothoracic, general surgery and head and neck surgery. The da Vinci Surgical System is used to perform, among other procedures, da Vinci Prostatectomy, da Vinci Partial Nephrectomy & Nephrectomy, da Vinci Cystectomy, da Vinci Pyeloplasty, da Vinci Hysterectomy, da Vinci Myomectomy, da Vinci Sacral Colpopexy, da Vinci Mitral Valve Repair, da Vinci Revascularization, da Vinci Thoracoscopy, da Vinci Lobectomy, da Vinci Gastric Bypass, da Vinci Low Anterior Colon Resection, da Vinci Thyroidectomy and da Vinci Trans Oral Robotic Surgery (for cancers of the throat). The development of new specialties and key procedures in partnership with leading surgeons have been, and will continue to be, a catalyst for the growth of our company. 3 Surgeon Value. We train and assist surgeons in building their practices by delivering superior patient value through improved surgical efficacy and reduced surgical trauma. 4. Hospital Value. We assist both academic and community hospitals in building value by offering superior patient value in terms of improved surgical efficacy and reduced surgical trauma thereby increasing surgical revenue and reducing costs through lower complication rates and reduced length of patient stay. We expect these efforts to increase demand for our products among competitive hospitals, surgeons and referring physicians. 9 Table of Contents Clinical Applications We believe our technology is capable of enhancing or enabling a wide variety of procedures in many surgical specialties. Surgeons using our da Vinci Surgical System have completed hundreds of thousands of surgical procedures of various types, including urologic, gynecologic, cardiothoracic, general and head and neck surgery procedures. These surgical applications, which are currently cleared by the FDA, are further described below. Urologic Surgery Prostatectomy. Radical prostatectomy is the removal of the prostate gland in patients diagnosed with clinically localized prostatic cancer. The standard approach to removal of the prostate has been via an open surgical procedure. The laparoscopic approach, while not prevalent, is an option, but is difficult and poses challenges to even the most skilled urologist. The da Vinci Surgical System allows for improved visualization of the gross anatomy (dorsal veins, endopelvic fascia, bladder muscle, puboprostatic ligaments), microanatomy (bladder muscosa, nerve bundles) and tissue planes, which are critical for an anatomic dissection. Peer reviewed clinical publications have reported that radical prostatectomy using the da Vinci Surgical System has improved oncologic results, reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, improved cosmesis, quicker return to normal activity and may provide a better nerve sparing operation. The da Vinci Surgical System has enabled a large number of surgeons to convert from using an open surgical technique to a minimally invasive technique. Nephrectomy (partial and total). Partial nephrectomy is the removal of a small portion of a kidney (typically, an area of the kidney containing a tumor), and total nephrectomy is the total removal of a kidney. Partial nephrectomies are most commonly performed in patients diagnosed with clinically localized renal cancer, when the tumor size is four centimeters or less in size. Total nephrectomies are also most commonly performed in patients diagnosed with clinically localized renal cancer that are not resectable with a partial nephrectomy and are also performed in patients suffering from various benign conditions. There are currently 3 surgical approaches to performing partial nephrectomies open surgical technique, which requires a large incision; laparoscopy, which allows the surgeon to operate through several small incisions, and hand assisted, which incorporates both laparoscopy and a modified open surgical technique. Surgeons have reported that the combination of the da Vinci Surgical System improved visualization capabilities and enhanced dexterity allows for greater precision and control during these complex surgical procedures, which could enable a large number of these procedures to be performed through this minimally invasive technique resulting in reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, shorter length of hospital stay, quicker return to normal activity and improved cosmesis. Cystectomy . Cystectomy is the removal of the bladder in patients diagnosed with bladder cancer. The current standard approach to the removal of the bladder is via an open surgical procedure. The laparoscopic approach, while not prevalent, is an option, but is difficult and poses challenges to even the most skilled urologist. The da Vinci Surgical System allows for improved visualization of the gross anatomy and tissue planes, which are critical for an anatomic dissection. The da Vinci Surgical System has enabled a number of these procedures to be converted from an open surgical technique to a minimally invasive technique, thus reducing blood loss and pain and allowing for the patient quicker return to normal activity. Pyeloplasty. Pyeloplasty is the surgical reconstruction or revision of the renal pelvis to drain and decompress the kidney. In nearly all cases, the goal of pyeloplasty surgery is to relieve a uretero pelvic junction (UPJ) obstruction. There are currently 2 surgical approaches to performing pyeloplasties open surgical technique, which requires a large incision, and laparoscopy, which allows the surgeon to operate through several small incisions. Surgeons have reported that the combination of the da Vinci Surgical System improved visualization capabilities and enhanced dexterity allows for greater precision and control during these complex surgical procedures, which could enable a large number of these procedures to be performed through this minimally invasive technique resulting in reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, shorter length of hospital stay, quicker return to normal activity and improved cosmesis. 10 Table of Contents Gynecologic Surgery Hysterectomy. Removal of the uterus is 1 of the most commonly performed surgeries in gynecology and is performed for a variety of benign and malignant conditions. Hysterectomies can be performed using open surgery, a vaginal approach, or MIS techniques, which include both laparoscopic and robotic approaches. Performing a hysterectomy requires a significant degree of tissue manipulation in the dissection and ligation, or tying, of blood vessels, ligaments and other pelvic structures. An MIS approach to hysterectomy is associated with less pain, shorter hospital stay and quicker recovery compared to an open surgical technique. It is often difficult to ensure the identification and prevention of injury to the ureters and bladder with conventional laparoscopic instruments because of the limited angles at which these instruments can be positi1d. Furthermore, in hysterectomy procedures for treating endometrial or cervical cancer, it is difficult to access and remove a large number of lymph nodes to better stage the cancer with conventional laparoscopic techniques. A robotic technique with use of the da Vinci Surgical System can bring the benefits of MIS to the patients while offsetting the limitations of conventional laparoscopy. Specifically, patients that would traditionally have a hysterectomy through an open surgical technique, for a complex benign or a malignant clinical condition may see significant benefit from a robotic MIS approach including reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, shorter length of hospital stay, quicker return to normal activity and improved cosmesis. We believe that our products will increase the surgeon dexterity in this procedure and, as a result, may have a significant impact on safety, operating time, and rate of adoption of port based techniques in hysterectomy. Myomectomy. Myomectomy, or removal of a myoma fibroid, is a surgical procedure performed when uterine preservation is sought. Women who desire to remain fertile are candidates for this procedure. Due to the substantial suturing required for this procedure, the standard surgical approach remains an open incision. There are some highly skilled gynecological laparoscopists who perform laparoscopic myomectomies, but to this point, it has remained a small minority. We believe that the da Vinci Surgical System improved visualization capabilities and enhanced dexterity allows for greater precision and control during these complex surgical procedures, which could enable a large number of these procedures to be performed minimally invasively resulting in reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, shorter length of hospital stay, quicker return to normal activity and improved cosmesis. Sacral Colpopexy. The abdominal sacral colpopexy is 1 of the most successful operations for vaginal vault prolapse. Sacral colpopexy involves suturing a synthetic mesh that connects and supports the vagina to the sacrum (tailb1). A sacral colpopexy can be performed using conventional laparoscopic technique, it is however, generally described as difficult and cumbersome to perform. da Vinci sacral colpopexy combines the benefits of a minimally invasive procedure with the durability of a traditional abdominal approach resulting in reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, shorter length of hospital stay, quicker return to normal activity and improved cosmesis. Cardiothoracic Surgery Mitral Valve Repair. When patients are diagnosed with mitral valve disease, there are 2 surgical treatment options from which they can choose mitral valve replacement or mitral valve repair. Mitral valve repairs are generally preferred over mitral valve replacement for a number of reasons, which include longevity and durability of the repaired valve over a replacement valve and the elimination or reduction of the patient post surgical pharmaceutical regimen. Since mitral valve repairs are considered to be more technically challenging than mitral valve replacements, they are only performed approximately 50% of the time. When performing da Vinci mitral valve repairs, surgeons have reported that the enhanced 3 D visualization provides for essential identification of difficult to see anatomical structures and tissue planes. EndoWrist joints permit them to precisely manipulate delicate structures inside of the heart and accurately place sutures into the targeted tissues. In addition, surgeons using the da Vinci Surgical System to operate from a lateral right sided approach have reported that this requires less tissue manipulation than operating through a sternotomy, while providing greater anatomical exposure. As a result of these factors, several of our surgeon customers have reported a significant improvement in their mitral valve repair rates (>95%) over mitral valve replacements within their practices. Our 11 Table of Contents da Vinci Surgical System is enabling heart valve repairs to be performed through small ports in a manner that could not have been accomplished with open surgery resulting in reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, shorter length of hospital stay, quicker return to normal activity and improved cosmesis. Cardiac Revascularization or Coronary Artery Bypass. The traditional approach to coronary artery bypass grafting, or CABG, involves splitting the breastb1 via a median sternotomy incision, placing the patient on cardio pulmonary bypass, or CPB, and bypassing diseased segments of arteries in the heart with conduit arteries and veins. Over time, successful results from this operation have been widely reported. However, there are known morbidities from this approach that MIS techniques for coronary artery bypass surgery seek to overcome. With assistance from the da Vinci Surgical System, patients can undergo single or multi vessel full surgical revascularization utilizing all arterial conduits (IMA BIMA), while avoiding CPB and the median sternotomy incision, thus reducing the morbidities associated with these procedures. In Single Vessel or Multi Vessel Small Thoracotomy bypass, or SVST MVST procedures, surgeons use the da Vinci Surgical System to precisely mobilize 1 or both internal mammary arteries for use in the bypass operation. This is accomplished through 3 small port incisions in the left chest and once completed, the middle port incision is extended into a four to six centimeter incision, enabling the surgeon to complete the anastomoses directly through the incision resulting in reduced operative blood loss, reduced postoperative pain, shorter length of hospital stay, quicker return to normal activity and improved cosmesis. In addition to reducing known morbidities from standard open chest coronary artery bypass surgery, revascularization with the da Vinci Surgical System places the patient on an accelerated path to recovery. When combined with percutaneous coronary intervention (PCI) in a hybrid approach, da Vinci Revascularization may also provide better outcomes than stenting al1, resulting in higher patency and lower re intervention rates. Thoracic Surgery. A number of surgical procedures performed in the thorax, or chest cavity, can be accomplished by minimally invasive methods. These methods are generally referred to as video assisted thoracoscopic (VATS) surgery. Procedures performed via these methods include wedge resection, lobectomy, thymectomy, mediastinal mass excision and esophagectomy. They include various types of lung resection, biopsy procedures, node dissections, nerve resections and esophageal surgery. Conventional thoracoscopic tools have all the limitations of conventional laparoscopic tools, such as backward counter intuitive movement and limited range of motion. We believe that the capability of our technology to operate dexterously in the small and restrictive space of the chest cavity offers significant clinical value in the performance of advanced thoracic surgical procedures like lobectomy. Use of the da Vinci System allows formal, anatomical resection, along with complete mediastinal lymph node dissection the gold standard treatment for early stage non small cell lung cancer. This approach provides effective treatment without the need for a formal thoracotomy (open technique), or facilitation access mini thoracotomy (video assisted thoracic surgery or VATS technique). General Surgery Low Anterior Resection. Low anterior resection (LAR) is a surgical procedure to treat rectal cancer. The surgeon dissects and removes the majority of the rectum, descending colon and a portion of healthy tissue and lymph nodes. Conventional laparoscopy is not widely employed to treat rectal cancer due to the high degree of difficulty. In fact, literature suggests that laparoscopic LAR may increase the rate of surgical complications and positive oncologic margins. Furthermore, pelvic nerve bundles that enable healthy bladder and sexual function may be compromised in both open and laparoscopic LAR procedures due to poor exposure, visualization and dexterity inherent in operating with conventional tools in a tight and deep surgical space. In contrast, the da Vinci Surgical System is a proven tool for performing precise cancer operations, with minimal complications, in the deep pelvis. As with da Vinci Prostatectomy, da Vinci Low Anterior Resection provides surgeons with greater dexterity, visualization and control when performing rectal cancer surgery as compared to open and laparoscopic approaches. We believe that da Vinci Low Anterior Resection not only enables a more precise operation with fewer complications and shorter recovery time, but may also improve oncologic outcomes. Gastric Bypass. A growing number of patients are undergoing surgical treatment for their morbid obesity. Laparoscopic roux en Y gastric bypass, or LRYGB, is the most commonly performed surgical procedure for 12 Table of Contents morbid obesity in the United States. Briefly, the LRYGB operation promotes weight loss by 2 mechanisms. First, the size of the stomach is greatly reduced by surgical stapling , thus restricting the amount of food the patient can consume at a given time. Second, a long segment of intestine is bypassed causing less food to be absorbed. The LRYGB is 1 of the most technically challenging laparoscopic procedures because of the suturing, stapling and tissue (bowel) manipulation that is required. A critical portion of the operation is anastomosing the stomach to the small intestine. Leaks in the anastomosis are the cause of major complications that can result in death. The da Vinci Surgical System is used by surgeons in suturing this anastomosis. We believe procedures performed with the da Vinci Surgical System incorporating a double layered hand sewn anastomosis results in fewer anastomotic leaks than in traditional laparoscopic procedures. Head and Neck Surgery Transoral Surgery . Head and neck cancer, which most often occurs in the throat due to prolonged tobacco and alcohol use, and has been linked to human papilloma virus, is treated by surgical resection or chemoradiation. Surgical resection is performed most often by an open approach, which at times requires a jaw splitting mandibulotomy. This procedure, while effective in treating cancer, is traumatic and disfiguring to the patient and requires extensive recovery and rehabilitation. Minimally invasive approaches via the mouth (transoral surgery) have seen little adoption due to a high degree of difficulty and line of sight limitations of conventional endoscopic tools. While chemoradiation does allow patients to avoid traumatic surgical incisions, literature suggests that this modality diminishes patients ability to speak and swallow normally. da Vinci Transoral Surgery, on the other hand, allows surgeons to treat cancers occurring in the oropharynx (e.g., tonsil and base of tongue) and larynx via the mouth. The da Vinci Surgical System extends the ability to resect tumors transorally, avoiding in many cases an open approach via mandibulotomy. We believe that da Vinci Transoral Surgery provides a more precise platform for complete resection of cancers of the oral cavity and maximizes the preservation of healthy tissue to maintain normal speech and swallowing function resulting in reduced length of hospital stay and time in which the patient requires a feeding tube. Thyroidectomy. Thyroid cancer is most commonly treated by thyroidectomy, the removal of all or part of the thyroid gland. Complete resection of the cancer and surrounding gland is required for proper oncologic outcomes. The surgeon must also precisely dissect and preserve an important nerve that sits deep to the gland in order to maintain proper voice function and spare the parathyroid glands that regulate calcium levels in the blood. For these reasons, open surgery is the dominant surgical approach. Endoscopic approaches with good functional outcomes have proven too difficult for the majority of surgeons. Open surgery however leaves a prominent and unsightly neck scar often as large as four to six centimeters. Surgeons are now using the da Vinci Surgical System to perform thyroidectomies from a remote site in the axilla (armpit). The precision, exposure and visualization achieved with the da Vinci Surgical System enables an endoscopic technique that is accessible to a broader set of surgeons. With da Vinci Thyroidectomy, surgeons are now able to offer their patients a procedure with no neck scar while maintaining the outcomes of open surgery for cancer control, voice preservation and calcium blood levels. Additional Clinical Applications We believe there are numerous additional applications that can be addressed with the da Vinci Surgical System. Surgeons using the da Vinci Surgical System have performed nearly 100 different types of surgery throughout the world. Sales and Customer Support We market our products through a direct sales force in the United States and parts of Europe. We also market our products outside the United States through distributors. Our direct sales force is comprised of sales managers, clinical sales representatives, training specialists, and technical service representatives. Sales activities include educating surgeons and hospital staff across multiple surgical specialties on the advantages of da Vinci 13 Table of Contents surgery and the clinical applications that our technology enables. We also train our sales force to educate hospital management on the potential benefits of adopting our technology, including clinical benefits of da Vinci Surgery, reductions in complications and length of stay and the resulting potential for increased patient satisfaction and volume. Once a hospital has installed a da Vinci Surgical System, our clinical sales representatives help drive the utilization of the system, and our technical service representatives provide service and maintenance for the system. No 1 customer accounted for more than 10% of revenue during the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008. As of December 31, 2010, we had approximately 700 employees in our field sales and service organizations, up from approximately 490 employees in these organizations as of December 31, 2009, primarily reflecting growth in our clinical sales force supporting procedures performed at customer sites. We expect to continue growing these organizations as we expand our business. Our da Vinci Surgical System typically has a lengthy sales cycle. It is viewed as a major capital equipment purchase by our customers and sales are often affected by the timing of their budgeting cycles. Our sales of da Vinci Surgical Systems tends to be heaviest during the third month of each quarter. A portion of our customers acquire da Vinci Surgical Systems through a capital lease or operating lease with a third party leasing company. In these instances, we typically sell the da Vinci System to the hospital or leasing company, and the hospital enters into an independent arrangement with the leasing company. Therefore we treat these leasing transactions the same as sales transactions for purposes of recognizing revenue for the sale. During the twelve months ended December 31, 2010, approximately 19% of our da Vinci System sales involved a lease. Our sales of EndoWrist instruments and accessories are driven by surgical procedures performed on installed systems. Our customers place orders to replenish their supplies of EndoWrist instruments and accessories on a regular basis. Orders received are typically shipped within 1 business day. Direct customers who purchase a new da Vinci System typically place an initial stocking order of EndoWrist instruments and accessories within 1 month of receiving their system. Our business is subject to seasonal fluctuations. Historically, our sales of da Vinci Surgical Systems have tended to be heaviest during the third month of each fiscal quarter, and lighter in the third and first fiscal quarters and heavier in the fourth fiscal quarter. In addition, historically, we have experienced lower procedure counts in the third fiscal quarter, higher procedure counts in the fourth fiscal quarter and lower procedure counts in the first fiscal quarter. Timing of procedures and changes in procedure growth directly affect the timing of instrument and accessory purchases and capital purchases. Customer Support and Training Programs Our goal is to provide exceptional value to our customers patients, surgeons and hospitals. We have a ne2rk of field service engineers across the United States, Europe and Asia and maintain relationships with various distributors around the globe. This infrastructure of service and support specialists offer a full complement of services, including 24 7 support, installation, repair and maintenance for our customers. We generate service revenue by providing these services to our customers through comprehensive service contracts and time and material programs. We provide basic system training that teaches the fundamental operating principles of the da Vinci Surgical System to surgeons and operating room nurses. We have established training centers where initial system training and ongoing surgical procedural training are provided, the latter by expert surgeons. In addition, we facilitate the proctoring of surgeons who are new to da Vinci Surgery by experienced da Vinci System users. Proctors provide training to other surgeons on how to perform certain surgical procedures with the da Vinci System. Research and Development We focus our research and development efforts on providing our customers with new products and product improvements that enable them to perform improved and innovative surgical procedures with less difficulty. We 14 Table of Contents maintain research and development and engineering staff responsible for product design and engineering. We invested $116.0 million, $95.1 million and $79.4 million of research and development expenses for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively. This investment is applied generally to all product areas, with specific areas of focus being identified from time to time. We establish strategic alliances with other medical device companies to complement our research and development effort. To date, these alliances have taken several forms, including cooperation in the areas of product development, training, and procedure development and marketing activities. We have formed alliances with several companies, including, but not limited to, Covidien Ltd., Johns Hopkins University, Johnson & Johnson, Luna Innovations, Inc., Medtronic, Inc., Novadaq Technologies, Inc., Olympus Corporation, USGI Medical, Inc and Cardica, Inc. Manufacturing We manufacture our da Vinci Surgical Systems at our facility in Sunnyvale, California. We manufacture our Endowrist instruments at our Sunnyvale facility and at our Mexicali, Mexico facility. We began production in Mexicali in July 2008. We purchase both custom and off the shelf comp1nts from a large number of suppliers and subject them to stringent quality specifications. Some of the comp1nts necessary for the assembly of our products are currently provided to us by sole sourced suppliers (the only recognized supply source available to us) or single sourced suppliers (the only approved supply source for us among other sources). We purchase comp1nts through purchase orders rather than long term supply agreements and generally do not maintain large volumes of finished goods. Competition We consider our primary competition to be existing open surgery, conventional MIS, drug therapies, radiation treatment and emerging interventional surgical approaches. Our success depends on continued clinical and technical innovation, quality and reliability as well as educating hospitals, surgeons and patients on the demonstrated benefits associated with da Vinci surgery and its superiority to other techniques. We also face competition from several companies that are developing new approaches and products for the MIS market. While a few of these potential competitors are seeking to incorporate robotics into their product offerings, most are focused on adding capability to manual MIS systems. Because many of these developments are aimed at MIS, we believe that our da Vinci Surgical System may actually prove complementary to these new technologies. In addition, a number of companies are using or planning to use robots and computers in surgery, including but not limited to Alf X , EndoControls, Inc., Meere Company, Inc., Olympus, and Titan Medical. Any company with substantial experience in industrial robotics could potentially expand into the field of surgical robotics and become a competitor. Our revenues may be adversely impacted if our competitors develop and introduce products that compete in our markets. Intellectual Property We place considerable importance on obtaining and maintaining patent, copyright and trade secret protection for significant new technologies, products and processes. We generally rely upon a combination of patents, copyrights, trademarks, trade secret and other laws (e.g., contractual restrictions on disclosure, copying and transferring title, including confidentiality agreements with vendors, strategic partners, co developers, employees, consultants and other third parties) to protect our proprietary rights in the developments, improvements and inventions that we have originated and which are incorporated in our products or that fall within our fields of interest. We also have agreements with third parties that provide for several exclusive and non exclusive licenses to their patents. 15 Table of Contents As of December 31, 2010, we held ownership or exclusive field of use license for more than 850 U.S. and foreign patents and more than 950 U.S. and foreign patent applications. Our patents and patent applications relate to a number of important aspects of our technology, including our surgeon console, electromechanical arms, vision system, endoscope positioning system and EndoWrist instruments. We intend to continue to file additional patent applications both in the United States and in foreign jurisdictions to seek protection for our technology. While our patents are an important element of our success, our business as a whole is not significantly dependent on any 1 patent. We have trademarks, both registered and unregistered, that are maintained and enforced to provide customer recognition for our products in the marketplace. Government Regulation United States Our products and operations are subject to extensive and rigorous regulation by the FDA. The FDA regulates the development, testing, manufacturing, safety, labeling, storage, recordkeeping, promotion, distribution, and production of medical devices in the United States to ensure that medical products distributed domestically are safe and effective for their intended uses. In addition, the FDA regulates the export of medical devices manufactured in the United States to international markets. Under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or FFDCA, medical devices are classified into 1 of 3 classes Class I, Class II or Class III depending on the degree of risk associated with each medical device and the extent of control needed to ensure safety and effectiveness. Our current products are Class II medical devices. Class II devices are those which are subject to the general controls and most require premarket demonstration of adherence to certain performance standards or other special controls, as specified by the FDA, and clearance by the FDA. Premarket review and clearance by the FDA for these devices is accomplished through the 510(k) premarket notification process. For most Class II devices, the manufacturer must submit to the FDA a premarket notification submission, demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent in intended use and technology to a predicate device that is either 1 a device that has grandfather marketing status because it was legally marketed prior to May 28, 1976, the date upon which the Medical Device Amendments of 1976 were enacted, or 2 a Class I or II device that has been cleared through the 510(k) process. If the FDA agrees that the device is substantially equivalent to a predicate device, it will grant clearance to commercially market the device. The FDA has a statutory 90 day period to respond to a 510(k) submission. As a practical matter, clearance often takes longer. The FDA may require further information, including clinical data, to make a determination regarding substantial equivalence. If the FDA determines that the device, or its intended use, is not substantially equivalent, the FDA will place the device, or the particular use of the device, into Class III, and the device sponsor must then fulfill much more rigorous pre marketing requirements. After a device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, requires a new 510(k) clearance or could require a pre market approval application, or PMA, approval. The FDA requires each manufacturer to make this determination in the first instance, but the FDA can review any such decision. If the FDA disagrees with a manufacturer decision not to seek a new 510(k) clearance, the agency may retroactively require the manufacturer to seek 510(k) clearance or PMA approval. The FDA also can require the manufacturer to cease marketing and or recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or PMA approval is obtained. Our manufacturing processes are required to comply with the FDA Good Manufacturing Practice, or GMP, requirements contained in its Quality System Regulation, or QSR. The QSR covers, among other things, 16 Table of Contents the methods and documentation of the design, testing, production, processes, controls, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, and shipping of a company products. The QSR also requires maintenance of a device master record, device history record, design history file and complaint files. Compliance with the QSR is necessary to receive FDA 510(k) clearance or approval to market new products and is necessary for a manufacturer to be able to continue to market cleared or approved product offerings. Among other things, these regulations require that manufacturers establish performance requirements before production. A company facility, records, and manufacturing processes are subject to periodic scheduled or unscheduled inspections by the FDA, which may issue reports known as Form FDA 483 reports (listing instances where the manufacturer has failed to comply with applicable regulations and or procedures), or Warning Letters which, if not adequately responded to, could lead to enforcement actions against the manufacturer, including fines and total shutdown of production facilities and criminal prosecution. Inspections usually occur every 2 years. Our last inspection occurred in July 2010 and the FDA issued a Form FDA 483 listing deficiencies under the QSR relating to complaint handling and manufacturing inspection handling. We later responded to each observation with proposed corrective actions. However, we cannot assure that, upon re inspection, the FDA will find that our corrective actions are appropriate or that they have been adequately implemented. We also cannot assure that the FDA will not find other deficiencies in our compliance with the QSR and other postmarket regulations. We believe our quality systems are functioning properly and we continue to work with the FDA and agencies worldwide to satisfy their reporting requirements. Other post market regulatory requirements apply to our commercial distribution of the da Vinci Surgical System, including the following QSR, which requires manufacturers to follow elaborate design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during the manufacturing process; labeling regulations; the FDA general prohibition against promoting products for unapproved or off label uses; the Reports of Corrections and Removals regulation, which requires that manufacturers report to the FDA recalls and field corrective actions taken to reduce a risk to health or to remedy a violation of the FFDCA that may pose a risk to health; and the Medical Device Reporting regulation, which requires that manufacturers report to the FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if it were to recur. We are subject to inspection and marketing surveillance by the FDA to determine compliance with all regulatory requirements. If the FDA finds that we have failed to comply, it can institute a wide variety of enforcement actions, ranging from a public warning letter to more severe sanctions including the following fines, injunctions, and civil penalties; recall or seizure of our products; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production; refusing our requests for 510(k) clearance or PMA approval of new products; withdrawing 510(k) clearance or PMA approvals already granted; and criminal prosecution. California Regulation The State of California requires that we obtain a license to manufacture medical devices and subjects us to periodic inspection. Our facilities and manufacturing processes were last inspected in February 2009 and were found to be in compliance. In accordance with the California State regulations, the license to manufacture is renewed annually with any updated manufacturing information. 17 Table of Contents Foreign Regulation In order for us to market our products in other countries, we must obtain regulatory approvals and comply with extensive safety and quality regulations in other countries. These regulations, including the requirements for approvals or clearance and the time required for regulatory review, vary from country to country. Failure to obtain regulatory approval in any foreign country in which we plan to market our products may harm our ability to generate revenue and harm our business. To be sold in Japan, most medical devices must undergo thorough safety examinations and demonstrate medical efficacy before they are granted approval, or Shonin. In November 2009, we received Shonin approval from the Japanese Ministry of Health, Labor, and Welfare, or MHLW, for our da Vinci S System in Japan. We are currently focusing our efforts with Johnson & Johnson K.K. Medical Company (Japan) on obtaining specific reimbursement for da Vinci procedures in Japan. If we are not successful in obtaining system wide single procedure reimbursements or obtaining approvals for future products and procedures, then the demand for our products could be limited. We have partnered with the experienced regulatory team from Johnson & Johnson K.K. Medical Company (Japan) in our Japanese regulatory process and are continuing to work with them to meet government requirements. We have partnered with Adachi Co., LTD as our separate independent distribution partner in Japan who is responsible for marketing, selling, and servicing our products in Japan. Commercialization of medical devices in Europe is regulated by the European Union (EU). The EU presently requires that all medical products bear the Conformite Europeene, or CE mark for compliance with the Medical Device Directive (MDD) (93 42 EEC). The CE mark is an international symbol of adherence to certain essential principles of safety and effectiveness mandated in applicable European medical device directives, which once affixed, enables a product to be sold in member countries of the EU. The CE mark is also recognized in many countries outside of the EU, such as Australia, and can assist in the clearance process. In order to affix the CE mark on products, a recognized European Notified Body must certify a manufacturer quality system for compliance with international and European requirements. We have received permission from DGM, our Notified Body and agent of the Danish Government, to affix the CE mark to our da Vinci Surgical System and EndoWrist instruments. To maintain authorization to apply the CE mark, we are subject to annual surveillance audits and periodic re certification audits. To date we have met these requirements and our CE certificate is valid until March 2012 and the MDD certificate is valid until March 2014. The most recent audit of the facility was in October 2010, and the facility was found to be in compliance. If we modify existing products or develop new products in the future, we may need to apply for permission to affix the CE mark to such products. We do not know whether we will be able to obtain permission to affix the CE mark for new or modified products or whether we will continue to meet the quality and safety standards required to maintain the permissions we have already received. If we are unable to maintain permission to affix the CE mark to our products, we will no longer be able to sell our products in member countries of the EU. The regulations in other countries, including the requirements for approvals or clearance and the time required for regulatory review, vary from country to country. These regulations typically require regulatory approvals, and compliance with extensive safety and quality system regulations. Failure to obtain regulatory approval in any foreign country in which we plan to market our products, or failure to comply with any regulation in any foreign country in which we market our products, may impact our ability to generate revenue and harm our business. Third Party Coverage and Reimbursement In the United States and international markets where we sell our products, the government and health insurance companies together are responsible for hospital and surgeon reimbursement for virtually all covered surgical procedures. Governments and insurance companies generally reimburse hospitals and physicians for surgery when the procedures are considered medically necessary. In the United States, the Centers for 18 Table of Contents Medicare & Medicaid Services, or CMS, administers the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Generally, reimbursement for professional services performed at the hospital by physicians is reported under separate billing codes issued by the American Medical Association, or AMA, known as Current Procedural Terminology, or CPT, codes. Physician reimbursement is based on a prospective payment system based on the professional service rendered. In addition, CMS and the National Center for Health Statistics, or NCHS, are jointly responsible for overseeing changes and modifications to billing codes known as ICD 9 CM codes used by hospitals to report inpatient procedures. CMS generally reimburses hospitals for services provided during an inpatient stay based on a prospective payment system that is determined by a classification system known as Medicare Severity Diagnostic Related Groupings, or DRGs and Ambulatory Payment Classifications, or APCs for hospital outpatient services. MS DRGs are assigned using a number of factors including the principal diagnosis, major procedures, discharged status, patient age and complicating secondary diagnoses among other things. On October 1, 2008, CMS and NCHS issued a new family of ICD 9 CM procedure codes for Robotically Assisted Procedures . For laparoscopic procedures completed with the da Vinci System, U.S. hospitals are expected to report the primary surgical procedure code, along with ICD 9 CM 17.42, to describe a laparoscopic robotic assisted procedure. The purpose of the ICD 9 CM family of procedure codes, 17.4X, is to gather data on robotic assisted surgical procedures. It does not influence the amount paid to hospitals. A surgical procedure, completed with or without robotic assistance, continues to be assigned to the same MS DRG. Governments and insurance companies carefully review and increasingly challenge the prices charged for medical products and surgical services. Reimbursement rates from private companies vary depending on the procedure performed, the third party payor and other factors. Because both hospitals and physicians receive the same reimbursement amount for their respective services regardless of the actual costs incurred by the hospital or physician in furnishing the care and is unrelated to the specific products used in that procedure, hospitals and physicians may decide not to use our products if reimbursement amounts are insufficient to cover any additional costs that hospitals incur in purchasing our products. Domestic institutions typically bill for the primary surgical procedure that includes our products to various third party payors, such as Medicare, Medicaid and other government programs and private insurance plans. Because our da Vinci Surgical System has been cleared for commercial distribution in the United States by the FDA, Medicare coverage and reimbursement are generally available for the primary surgical procedure using our device. We believe that the additional procedures we intend to target are established surgical procedures that are generally already reimbursable by government agencies and insurance companies. If hospitals do not obtain sufficient reimbursement from third party payors for procedures performed with our products, or if governmental and private payors policies do not cover surgical procedures performed using our products, we may not be able to generate the revenues necessary to support our business. In such circumstances, we may need to seek a unique CPTcode for robotic assisted surgery from the AMA and or work with CMS to obtain coverage and or establish a higher reimbursement amount. If an application for a unique code or modifier is required, reimbursement for any use of our products may be unavailable until appropriate new code is granted. The application process, from filing until adoption of a new code, can take 2 or more years. In countries outside the United States, reimbursement is obtained from various sources, including governmental authorities, private health insurance plans, and labor unions. In most foreign countries, private insurance systems may also offer payments for some therapies. Additionally, health maintenance organizations are emerging in certain European countries. To effectively conduct our business, we may need to seek international reimbursement approvals, and we do not know if these required approvals will be obtained in a timely manner or at all. In Japan, we intend to seek reimbursement approvals from the government for procedures performed with our products. The timing of these approvals can vary significantly, and could significantly impact our ability to commercialize our products in Japan. In some countries patients may be permitted to pay directly for surgical services. However, such co pay practices are not common in countries such as Japan. 19 Table of Contents In March 2010, the President signed the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Affordability Reconciliation Act (collectively, the PPACA ), which makes changes that are expected to significantly impact the pharmaceutical and medical device industries. 1 of the principal aims of the PPACA as currently enacted is to expand health insurance coverage to approximately 32 million Americans who are currently uninsured. The consequences of these significant coverage expansions on the sales of the Company products are unknown and speculative at this point. The PPACA contains a number of provisions designed to generate the revenues necessary to fund the coverage expansions among other things. This includes new fees or taxes on certain health related industries, including medical device manufacturers. Beginning in 2013, medical device manufacturers will have to pay an excise tax (or sales tax) of 23 percent of certain U.S. medical device revenues. Though there are some exceptions to the excise tax, this excise tax applies to most of the Company products and product candidates sold within the U.S.. The PPACA provisions on comparative clinical effectiveness research extend the initiatives of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, also known as the stimulus package, which included $11 billion in funding to study the comparative effectiveness of health care treatments and strategies. This stimulus funding was designated for, among other things, conducting, supporting or synthesizing research that compares and evaluates the risks and benefits, clinical outcomes, effectiveness and appropriateness of products. The PPACA appropriates additional funding to comparative clinical effectiveness research. Although Congress has indicated that this funding is intended to improve the quality of health care, it remains unclear how the research will impact current Medicare coverage and reimbursement or how new information will influence other third party payor policies. The PPACA, as well as other federal or state health care reform measures that may be adopted in the future, could have a material adverse effect on our industry generally and our ability to successfully commercialize our products or could limit or eliminate our spending on certain development projects. The taxes imposed by the new federal legislation and the expansion in the government role in the U.S. healthcare industry may result in decreased profits to us, lower reimbursement by payors for our products, and or reduced medical procedure volumes, all of which may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Any regulatory or legislative developments in domestic or foreign markets that eliminate or reduce reimbursement rates for procedures performed with our products could harm our ability to sell our products or cause downward pressure on the prices of our products, either of which would affect our ability to generate the revenues necessary to support our business. Employees As of December 31, 2010, we had 1,660 employees, 218 of whom were engaged directly in research and development, 511 in manufacturing and service and 931 in marketing, sales, and administrative activities. N1 of our employees are covered by a collective bargaining agreement, and we consider our relationship with our employees to be good. Website Access to Reports We make our periodic and current reports, including our Annual Reports on Form 10 K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K, our Code of Business Conduct and Ethics Policy and any amendments to those reports, available free of charge, on our website as soon as practicable after such material is electronically filed or furnished with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Our website address is www.intuitivesurgical.com and the reports are filed under SEC Filings, on the Company Investor Relations portion of our website. We periodically webcast company announcements, product launch events and executive presentations which can be viewed via our Investor Relations web site. Additionally, we provide notifications of our material news including SEC filings, investor events, and press releases as part of our Investor Relations web site. The contents of these web sites are not intended to be incorporated by reference into this report or in any other report or document we file and any references to these web sites are intended to be inactive textual references only. 20 Table of Contents ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS RISKS RELATING TO OUR BUSINESS IF OUR PRODUCTS DO NOT ACHIEVE MARKET ACCEPTANCE, WE WILL NOT BE ABLE TO GENERATE THE REVENUE NECESSARY TO SUPPORT OUR BUSINESS. The da Vinci Surgical System and our other products represent a fundamentally new way of performing surgery. Achieving physician, patient and third party payor acceptance of da Vinci surgery as a preferred method of performing surgery will be crucial to our success. If our products fail to achieve market acceptance, hospitals will not purchase our products and we will not be able to generate the revenue necessary to support our business. We believe that physicians and third party payors acceptance of the benefits of procedures performed using our products will be essential for acceptance of our products by patients. Physicians will not recommend the use of our products unless we can demonstrate that they produce results comparable or superior to existing surgical techniques. Even if we can prove the effectiveness of our products through clinical trials, surgeons may elect not to use our products for any number of other reasons. For example, cardiologists may continue to recommend conventional heart surgery simply because such surgery is already widely accepted. In addition, surgeons may be slow to adopt our products because of the perceived liability risks arising from the use of new products and the uncertainty of reimbursement from third party payors, particularly in light of ongoing health care reform initiatives. We expect that there will be a learning process involved for surgical teams to become proficient in the use of our products. Broad use of our products will require training of surgical teams. Market acceptance could be delayed by the time required to complete this training. We may not be able to rapidly train surgical teams in numbers sufficient to generate adequate demand for our products. ECONOMIC CONDITIONS COULD MATERIALLY ADVERSELY AFFECT OUR COMPANY. During 2009 and 2008, the global economy experienced a severe downturn due to the sequential effects of the subprime lending crisis, the credit market crisis, collateral effects on the finance and banking industries, volatile currency exchange rates and energy costs, concerns about inflation, slower economic activity, decreased consumer confidence, reduced corporate profits and capital spending, adverse business conditions and liquidity concerns. Uncertainty about current global economic conditions continue to pose a risk as customers may postp1 spending in response to restraints on credit. There could be additional effects from the credit crisis on our business, including the insolvency of key suppliers or their inability to obtain credit to finance the development and or manufacture of our products resulting in product delays, and the inability of our customers and distributors, to obtain credit to finance purchases of our products. If conditions worsen or if the improved economic conditions are slower than anticipated, our forecasted demand may not materialize to the levels we require to achieve our anticipated financial results, which could in turn have a material adverse effect on our revenue, profitability and the market price of our stock. BECAUSE OUR MARKETS ARE HIGHLY COMPETITIVE, CUSTOMERS MAY CHOOSE TO PURCHASE OUR COMPETITORS PRODUCTS OR MAY NOT ACCEPT DA VINCI SURGERY, WHICH WOULD RESULT IN REDUCED REVENUE AND LOSS OF MARKET SHARE. da Vinci surgery is a new technology that competes with established and emerging treatment options in both disease management and reconstructive medical procedures. These competitive treatment options include conventional MIS, open surgery, interventional approaches, or pharmacological regimens. Some of these procedures are widely accepted in the medical community and in many cases have a long history of use. Technological advances could make such treatments more effective or less expensive than using our products, which could render our products obsolete or unmarketable. Studies could be published that show that other treatment options are more beneficial and or cost effective than da Vinci surgery. We cannot be certain that physicians will use our products to replace or supplement established treatments or that our products will continue to be competitive with current or future technologies. 21 Table of Contents In addition, we may face competition from companies that develop wristed, robotic or computer assisted surgical systems and products in the future. Our revenues may be reduced or eliminated if our competitors develop and market products that are more effective or less expensive than our products. If we are unable to compete successfully, our revenues will suffer. We may not be able to maintain or improve our competitive position against current or potential competitors, especially those with greater resources. NEW PRODUCT INTRODUCTIONS MAY ADVERSELY IMPACT OUR FINANCIAL RESULTS. We introduce new products with enhanced features and extended capabilities from time to time. Our products are subject to various regulatory processes, and we must obtain and maintain regulatory approvals in order to sell our new products. If a potential purchaser believes that we plan to introduce a new product in the near future or if a potential purchaser is located in a country where a new product that we have introduced has not yet received regulatory approval, planned purchases may be deferred or delayed. As a result, new product introductions may adversely impact our financial results. WE EXPERIENCE LONG AND VARIABLE CAPITAL SALES CYCLES AND SEASONALITY IN OUR BUSINESS, WHICH MAY CAUSE FLUCTUATIONS IN OUR FINANCIAL RESULTS. Our da Vinci Surgical System has a lengthy sales and purchase order cycle because it is a major capital item and its purchase generally requires the approval of senior management of hospitals , their parent organizations, purchasing groups, and government bodies, as applicable. This approval process can be lengthy. In addition, hospitals may delay or accelerate system purchases in conjunction with timing of their capital budget timelines. As a result, it is difficult for us to predict the length of capital sales cycles and, therefore, the exact timing of capital sales. Historically, our sales of da Vinci Surgical Systems have tended to be heaviest during the third month of each fiscal quarter, and lighter in the third and first fiscal quarters and heavier in the fourth fiscal quarter. Recently, we have experienced procedure growth for a number of benign conditions, including hysterectomies for benign conditions, sacrocolpoplexies, myomectomies, and certain other surgeries. Surgeries for benign conditions represented more than 40% of our total procedures in 2010. Many of these types of surgeries may be postp1d in the short term by patients to avoid vacation periods and for other personal scheduling reasons. Patients may also accelerate procedures to take advantage of insurance funding cut off dates. Historically, we have experienced lower procedure counts in the third fiscal quarter, higher procedure counts in the fourth fiscal quarter and lower procedure counts in the first fiscal quarter. Timing of procedures and changes in procedure growth directly affect the timing of instrument and accessory purchases and capital purchases. The above factors may contribute to substantial fluctuations in our quarterly operating results. Because of these fluctuations, it is likely that in some future quarters our operating results will fall below the expectations of securities analysts or investors. If that happens, the market price of our stock would likely decrease. These fluctuations, among other factors, also mean that you will not be able to rely upon our operating results in any particular period as an indication of future performance. In addition, the introduction of new products could adversely impact our sales cycle, as customers take additional time to assess the benefits and costs of such products. INTERNATIONAL SALES OF OUR PRODUCTS ACCOUNT FOR A SIGNIFICANT PORTION OF OUR REVENUES, WHICH EXPOSES US TO RISKS INHERENT IN INTERNATIONAL OPERATIONS. OUR GROWTH MAY BE LIMITED IF WE ARE UNABLE TO SUCCESSFULLY MANAGE OUR INTERNATIONAL ACTIVITIES. Our business currently depends in part on our activities in Europe and other foreign markets. Revenue from markets outside of the United States accounted for approximately 20%, 21%, and 22% of our revenue for the 22 Table of Contents years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively. We are subject to a number of challenges that specifically relate to our international business activities. These challenges include failure of local laws to provide the same degree of protection against infringement of our intellectual property rights; protectionist laws and business practices that favor local competitors, which could slow our growth in international markets; the risks associated with foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations; the expense of establishing facilities and operations in new foreign markets; and building an organization capable of supporting geographically dispersed operations. A large portion of our international sales are denominated in United States dollars. As a result, an increase in the value of the United States dollar relative to foreign currencies could make our products less competitive and or less affordable in international markets. If we are unable to meet and overcome these challenges, our international operations may not be successful, which would limit the growth of our business. WE UTILIZE DISTRIBUTORS FOR A PORTION OF OUR SALES, THE LOSS OF WHICH COULD HARM OUR REVENUES IN THE TERRITORY SERVICED BY THESE DISTRIBUTORS. We have strategic relationships with a number of key distributors for sales and service of our products, in certain foreign countries. If these strategic relationships are terminated and not replaced, our revenues and or ability to service our products in the territories serviced by these distributors could be adversely affected. WE MAY INCUR LOSSES ASSOCIATED WITH CURRENCY FLUCTUATIONS AND MAY NOT BE ABLE TO EFFECTIVELY HEDGE OUR EXPOSURE. Our operating results are subject to fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates. We attempt to mitigate a portion of these risks through foreign currency hedging, based on our judgment of the appropriate trade offs among risk, opportunity and expense. We have established a hedging program to partially hedge our exposure to foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations primarily for the Euro and the British Pound. We regularly review our hedging program and make adjustments as necessary based on our assessment of the relevant risks, opportunities and expenses. Our hedging activities may not offset more than a portion of the adverse financial impact resulting from unfavorable movement in foreign currency exchange rates, which could adversely affect our financial condition or results of operations. IF DEFECTS ARE DISCOVERED IN OUR PRODUCTS, WE MAY INCUR ADDITIONAL UNFORESEEN COSTS, HOSPITALS MAY NOT PURCHASE OUR PRODUCTS AND OUR REPUTATION MAY SUFFER. Our products incorporate mechanical parts, electrical comp1nts, optical comp1nts and computer software, any of which can contain errors or failures, especially when first introduced. In addition, new products or enhancements may contain undetected errors or performance problems that, despite testing, are discovered only after commercial shipment. Because our products are designed to be used to perform complex surgical procedures, we expect that our customers will have an increased sensitivity to such defects. In the past, we have voluntarily recalled certain products as a result of performance problems. We cannot assure that our products will not experience comp1nt aging, errors or performance problems in the future. If we experience flaws or performance problems, any of the following could occur delays in product shipments; loss of revenue; 23 Table of Contents delay in market acceptance; diversion of our resources; damage to our reputation; product recalls; regulatory actions; increased service or warranty costs; or product liability claims. THE USE OF OUR PRODUCTS COULD RESULT IN PRODUCT LIABILITY CLAIMS THAT COULD BE EXPENSIVE, DIVERT MANAGEMENT S ATTENTION AND HARM OUR BUSINESS. Our business exposes us to significant risks of product liability claims. The medical device industry has historically been litigious, and we face financial exposure to product liability claims if the use of our products were to cause injury or death. There is also the possibility that defects in the design or manufacture of our products might necessitate a product recall. Any weaknesses in training and services associated with our products may also be subject to product liability lawsuits. Although we maintain product liability insurance, the coverage limits of these policies may not be adequate to cover future claims. Particularly as sales of our products increase, we may be unable to maintain product liability insurance in the future at satisfactory rates or in adequate amounts. A product liability claim, regardless of its merit or eventual outcome, could result in significant legal defense costs. Product liability claims have been made against our company in the past. A product liability claim or any product recalls could also harm our reputation or result in a decline in revenues. WE MAY ENCOUNTER MANUFACTURING PROBLEMS OR DELAYS THAT COULD RESULT IN LOST REVENUE. Manufacturing our products is a complex process. We may encounter difficulties in scaling up production of our products, including problems involving production yields; quality control and assurance; comp1nt supply shortages; shortages of qualified personnel; and compliance with state, federal and foreign regulations. If demand for our products exceeds our manufacturing capacity, we could develop a substantial backlog of customer orders. If we are unable to maintain larger scale manufacturing capabilities, our ability to generate revenues will be limited and our reputation in the marketplace could be damaged. OUR RELIANCE ON SOLE AND SINGLE SOURCE SUPPLIERS COULD HARM OUR ABILITY TO MEET DEMAND FOR OUR PRODUCTS IN A TIMELY MANNER OR WITHIN BUDGET. Some of the comp1nts necessary for the assembly of our products are currently provided to us by sole sourced suppliers or single sourced suppliers. We purchase comp1nts through purchase orders rather than long term supply agreements and generally do not maintain large volumes of inventory. While alternative suppliers exist and could be identified for sole sourced comp1nts, the disruption or termination of the supply of comp1nts could cause a significant increase in the costs of these comp1nts, which could affect our operating results. A disruption or termination in the supply of comp1nts could also result in our inability to 24 Table of Contents meet demand for our products, which could harm our ability to generate revenues, lead to customer dissatisfaction and damage our reputation. Furthermore, if we are required to change the manufacturer of a key comp1nt of our products, we may be required to verify that the new manufacturer maintains facilities and procedures that comply with quality standards and with all applicable regulations and guidelines. The delays associated with the verification of a new manufacturer could delay our ability to manufacture our products in a timely manner or within budget. IF INSTITUTIONS OR SURGEONS ARE UNABLE TO OBTAIN COVERAGE AND REIMBURSEMENT FROM THIRD PARTY PAYORS FOR PROCEDURES USING OUR PRODUCTS, OR IF REIMBURSEMENT IS INSUFFICIENT TO COVER THE COSTS OF PURCHASING OUR PRODUCTS, WE MAY BE UNABLE TO GENERATE SUFFICIENT SALES TO SUPPORT OUR BUSINESS. In the United States, hospitals generally bill the services performed with our products to various third party payors, such as Medicare, Medicaid and other government programs and private insurance plans. If hospitals do not obtain sufficient reimbursement from third party payors for procedures performed with our products, or if government and private payors policies do not cover surgical procedures performed using our products, we may not be able to generate the revenues necessary to support our business. Our success in international markets also depends upon the eligibility of our products for coverage and reimbursement through government sponsored health care payment systems and third party payors. Reimbursement practices vary significantly by country. Many international markets have government managed healthcare systems that control reimbursement for new products and procedures. Other foreign markets have both private insurance systems and government managed systems that control reimbursement for new products and procedures. Market acceptance of our products may depend on the availability and level of coverage and reimbursement in any country within a particular time. In addition, health care cost containment efforts similar to those we face in the United States are prevalent in many of the other countries in which we intend to sell our products and these efforts are expected to continue. Please see our risk factor below titled Healthcare Policy Changes, Including Recently Enacted Legislation Reforming the U.S. Healthcare System, May Have a Material Adverse Effect on Our Financial Condition and Results of Operations and Healthcare Reforms, Changes in Healthcare Policies and Changes to Third Party Reimbursements May Affect Demand for Our Products for additional risks related to the ability of institutions or surgeons to obtain reimbursements. IF WE LOSE OUR KEY PERSONNEL OR ARE UNABLE TO ATTRACT AND RETAIN ADDITIONAL PERSONNEL, OUR ABILITY TO COMPETE WILL BE HARMED. We are highly dependent on the principal members of our management and scientific staff. Our product development plans depend, in part, on our ability to attract and retain engineers with experience in mechanics, software and optics. Attracting and retaining qualified personnel will be critical to our success, and competition for qualified personnel is intense. We may not be able to attract and retain personnel on acceptable terms given the competition for such personnel among technology and healthcare companies and universities. The loss of any of these persons or our inability to attract and retain qualified personnel could harm our business and our ability to compete. NATURAL OR OTHER DISASTERS COULD DISRUPT OUR BUSINESS AND RESULT IN LOSS OF REVENUE OR IN HIGHER EXPENSES. Natural disasters, terrorist activities and other business disruptions could seriously harm our revenue and financial condition and increase our costs and expenses. Our corporate headquarters and many of our operations are located in California, a seismically active region. A natural disaster in any of our major markets in North America or Europe could have a material adverse impact on our operations, operating results and financial condition. Further, any unanticipated business disruption caused by Internet security threats, damage to global communication ne2rks or otherwise could have a material adverse impact on our operating results. 25 Table of Contents CHANGES TO FINANCIAL ACCOUNTING STANDARDS MAY AFFECT OUR REPORTED RESULTS OF OPERATIONS. A change in accounting standards or practices can have a significant effect on our reported results and may even affect our reporting of transactions completed before the change is effective. New accounting pronouncements and varying interpretations of accounting pronouncements have occurred and may occur in the future. Changes to existing standards or the questioning of current practices may adversely affect our reported financial results or the way we conduct our business. UNFAVORABLE RESULTS OF LEGAL PROCEEDINGS COULD MATERIALLY ADVERSELY AFFECT US. We are and may become subject to various legal proceedings and claims that arise in or outside the ordinary course of business. On August 6, 2010, a purported class action lawsuit was filed against us and several of our officers and directors in the United States District Court for the Northern District of California seeking unspecified damages on behalf of a putative class of persons who purchased or otherwise acquired our common stock between February 1, 2008 and January 7, 2009. The complaint alleges that we violated federal securities laws by making allegedly false and misleading statements and omitting certain material facts in our filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. 2 purported derivative actions making substantially similar allegations were filed in the Superior Court of California for the County of Santa Clara shortly thereafter. Those actions are described more fully under , Item 3, Legal Proceedings. The results of these lawsuits and other legal proceedings cannot be predicted with certainty. Accordingly, we cannot determine whether our insurance coverage would be sufficient to cover the costs or potential losses, if any. Regardless of merit, litigation may be both time consuming and disruptive to our operations and cause significant expense and diversion of management attention. If we do not prevail in the purported class action lawsuit or other legal proceedings, we may be faced with significant m1tary damages or injunctive relief against us that may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations, possibly materially. WE ARE SUBJECT TO SIGNIFICANT, UNINSURED LIABILITIES. For certain risks, we do not maintain insurance coverage because of cost and or availability. For example, we indemnify our directors and officers for third party claims and do not insure for the underlying losses, and we do not carry earthquake insurance, among others. In addition, in the future, we may not continue to maintain certain existing insurance coverage or adequate levels of coverage. Premiums for many types of insurance have increased significantly over the years, and depending on market conditions and our circumstances, in the future, certain types of insurance such as directors and officers insurance or products liability insurance may not be available on acceptable terms or at all. Because we retain some portion of our insurable risks, and in some cases self insure completely, unforeseen or catastrophic losses in excess of insurance coverage could require us to pay substantial amounts, which would materially adversely affect our financial condition and operating results. WE USE ESTIMATES, MAKE JUDGMENTS AND APPLY CERTAIN METHODS IN MEASURING THE PROGRESS OF OUR BUSINESS. IN DETERMINING OUR FINANCIAL RESULTS AND IN APPLYING OUR ACCOUNTING POLICIES. AS THESE ESTIMATES, JUDGMENTS, AND METHODS CHANGE, OUR ASSESSMENT OF THE PROGRESS OF OUR BUSINESS AND OUR RESULTS OF OPERATIONS COULD VARY. The methods, estimates, and judgments we use in applying our accounting policies have a significant impact on our results of operations. Such methods, estimates, and judgments are, by their nature, subject to substantial risks, uncertainties, and assumptions, and factors may arise over time that lead us to change our methods, estimates, and judgments. Changes in any of our assumptions may adversely affect our reported financial results. 26 Table of Contents In addition, we utilize methods for determining surgical market sizes and da Vinci procedures completed that involve estimates and judgments, which are, by their nature, subject to substantial risks, uncertainties, and assumptions. Our estimates of surgical market sizes or da Vinci procedures performed do not have an impact on our results of operations but are used to estimate the progress of our business. Estimates and judgments for determining surgical market sizes and da Vinci procedures may vary over time with changes in treatment modalities, hospital reporting behavior, increases in procedures per field employee and other factors. In addition, over time, we may change the method for determining market sizes and da Vinci procedures, causing variation in our reporting. CHANGES IN OUR EFFECTIVE TAX RATE MAY HARM OUR RESULTS OF OPERATIONS A number of factors may harm our future effective tax rates including the jurisdictions in which profits are determined to be earned and taxed; the resolution of issues arising from tax audits with various tax authorities; changes in valuation of our deferred tax assets and liabilities; increases in expenses not deductible for tax purposes, including write offs of acquired intangibles and impairment of goodwill in connection with acquisitions; changes in available tax credits; changes in share based compensation; changes in tax laws or the interpretation of such tax laws and changes in generally accepted accounting principles; and the repatriation of non U.S. earnings for which we have not previously provided for U.S. taxes. Any significant increase in our future effective tax rates could harm net income for future periods. WE MAY REALIZE LOSSES ON OUR INVESTMENTS IN AUCTION RATE SECURITIES OR BE UNABLE TO LIQUIDATE THESE INVESTMENTS AT DESIRED TIMES AND IN DESIRED AMOUNTS. At December 31, 2010, we held $18.6 million in auction rate securities (ARS), whose underlying assets are student loans which are substantially backed by the federal government. Since the auctions for these securities have continued to fail since February 2008, these investments are not currently trading and therefore do not have a readily determinable market value. Accordingly, the estimated fair value of the ARS no longer approximates par value. Accordingly, changes in associated market value during the year ended December 31, 2010 have been recorded through other comprehensive income. If the market conditions deteriorate further, we may be required to record additional unrealized losses in other comprehensive income or impairment charges. We may not be able to liquidate these investments unless the issuer calls the security, a successful auction occurs, a buyer is found outside of the auction process, or the security matures. DISRUPTION OF CRITICAL INFORMATION SYSTEMS COULD HARM OUR BUSINESS AND FINANCIAL CONDITION. Information technology helps us operate efficiently, interface with customers, maintain financial accuracy and efficiency, and accurately produce our financial statements. If we do not allocate and effectively manage the resources necessary to build and sustain the proper technology infrastructure, we could be subject to transaction errors, processing inefficiencies, the loss of customers, business disruptions, or the loss of or damage to intellectual property through security breach. If our data management systems do not effectively collect, store, process and report relevant data for the operation of our business, whether due to equipment malfunction or constraints, software deficiencies, or human error, our ability to effectively plan, forecast and execute our 27 Table of Contents business plan and comply with applicable laws and regulations will be impaired, perhaps materially. Any such impairment could materially and adversely affect our financial condition, results of operations, cash flows and the timeliness with which we report our internal and external operating results. RISKS RELATING TO OUR REGULATORY ENVIRONMENT HEALTHCARE POLICY CHANGES, INCLUDING RECENTLY ENACTED LEGISLATION REFORMING THE U.S. HEALTHCARE SYSTEM, MAY HAVE A MATERIAL ADVERSE EFFECT ON OUR FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS. In March 2010, the President signed the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Affordability Reconciliation Act (collectively, the PPACA ), which makes changes that are expected to significantly impact the pharmaceutical and medical device industries. 1 of the principal aims of the PPACA as currently enacted is to expand health insurance coverage to approximately 32 million Americans who are currently uninsured. The consequences of these significant coverage expansions on the sales of our products are unknown and speculative at this point. The PPACA contains a number of provisions designed to generate the revenues necessary to fund the coverage expansions among other things. This includes new fees or taxes on certain health related industries, including medical device manufacturers. Beginning in 2013, medical device manufacturer will have to pay an excise tax (or sales tax) of 23 percent of certain U.S. medical device revenues. Though there are some exceptions to the excise tax, this excise tax does applies to all of our products and product candidates sold within the U.S.. The PPACA provisions on comparative clinical effectiveness research extend the initiatives of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, also known as the stimulus package, which included $11 billion in funding to study the comparative effectiveness of health care treatments and strategies. This stimulus funding was designated for, among other things, conducting, supporting or synthesizing research that compares and evaluates the risks and benefits, clinical outcomes, effectiveness and appropriateness of products. The PPACA appropriates additional funding to comparative clinical effectiveness research. Although Congress has indicated that this funding is intended to improve the quality of health care, it remains unclear how the research will impact current Medicare coverage and reimbursement or how new information will influence other third party payor policies. We expect that the PPACA, as well as other federal or state health care reform measures that may be adopted in the future, could have a material adverse effect on our industry generally and our ability to successfully commercialize our products or could limit or eliminate our spending on certain development projects. The taxes imposed by the new federal legislation and the expansion in the government role in the U.S. healthcare industry may result in decreased profits to us, lower reimbursement by payors for our products, and or reduced medical procedure volumes, all of which may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. HEALTHCARE REFORMS, CHANGES IN HEALTHCARE POLICIES AND CHANGES TO THIRD PARTY COVERAGE AND REIMBURSEMENTS MAY AFFECT DEMAND FOR OUR PRODUCTS. The U. S. government has in the past considered, is currently considering and may in the future, consider healthcare policies and proposals intended to curb rising healthcare costs, including those that could significantly affect both private and public reimbursement for healthcare services. State and local governments, as well as a number of foreign governments, are also considering or have adopted similar types of policies. While we believe that minimally invasive surgery using da Vinci Surgical Systems reduces healthcare costs, future significant changes in the healthcare systems in the United States or elsewhere, and current uncertainty about whether and how changes may be implemented, could have a negative impact on the demand for our products. We are unable to predict whether other healthcare legislation or regulations affecting our business may be proposed or enacted in the future; what effect any legislation or regulation would have on our business; or the effect ongoing uncertainty about these matters will have on the purchasing decisions of our customers. 28 Table of Contents WE ARE SUBJECT TO FEDERAL, STATE AND FOREIGN LAWS GOVERNING OUR BUSINESS PRACTICES WHICH, IF VIOLATED, COULD RESULT IN SUBSTANTIAL PENALTIES. ADDITIONALLY, CHALLENGES TO OR INVESTIGATION INTO OUR PRACTICES COULD CAUSE ADVERSE PUBLICITY AND BE COSTLY TO RESPOND TO AND THUS COULD HARM OUR BUSINESS. The Medicare and Medicaid anti kickback laws, and several similar state laws, prohibit payments or other remuneration that is intended to induce hospitals, physicians or other potential purchasers of our products either to refer patients or to purchase, lease or order, or arrange for or recommend the purchase, lease or order of healthcare products or services for which payment may be made under federal and state healthcare programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid. . Further, the recently enacted PPACA, among other things, amends the intent requirement of the federal anti kickback and criminal health care fraud statutes. A person or entity no longer needs to have actual knowledge of this statute or specific intent to violate it. In addition, the PPACA provides that the government may assert that a claim including Item or services resulting from a violation of the federal anti kickback statute constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of the false claims statutes. Moreover, some states, such as California, Massachusetts and Vermont, mandate implementation of commercial compliance programs to ensure compliance with these laws. These laws affect our sales, marketing and other promotional activities by limiting the kinds of financial arrangements we may have with hospitals, physicians or other potential purchasers of our products. They particularly impact how we structure our sales offerings, including discount practices, customer support, education and training programs, physician consulting and other service arrangements. These laws are broadly written, and it is often difficult to determine precisely how these laws will be applied to specific circumstances. Violating anti kickback laws can result in civil and criminal penalties, which can be substantial and include potential exclusion from healthcare programs for noncompliance. Even an unsuccessful challenge or investigation into our practices could cause adverse publicity, and be costly to defend, and thus could harm our business and results of operations. The PPACA also imposes new reporting and disclosure requirements on device manufacturers for any transfer of value made or distributed to prescribers and other healthcare providers, effective March 30, 2013 Such information must be made publicly available in a searchable format beginning September 30, 2013 In addition, device manufacturers will also be required to report and disclose any investment interests held by physicians and their immediate family members during the preceding calendar year. Failure to submit required information may result in civil m1tary penalties of up to an aggregate of $150,000 per year (and up to an aggregate of $1 million per year for knowing failures ), for all payments, transfers of value or ownership or investment interests not reported in an annual submission. In addition, there has been a recent trend of increased federal and state regulation of payments made to physicians, including the tracking and reporting of gifts, compensation, and other remuneration to physicians. The shifting commercial compliance environment and the need to build and maintain robust and expandable systems to comply with multiple jurisdictions with different compliance and or reporting requirements increases the possibility that a healthcare company may run afoul of 1 or more of the requirements. Compliance with complex foreign and U.S. laws and regulations that apply to our international operations increases our cost of doing business in international jurisdictions and could expose us or our employees to fines and penalties in the U.S. and or abroad. These numerous and sometimes conflicting laws and regulations include US laws such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and local laws prohibiting corrupt payments to government officials. Violations of these laws and regulations could result in fines, criminal sanctions against us, our officers, or our employees, prohibitions on the conduct of our business, and damage to our reputation. Although we have implemented policies and procedures designed to ensure compliance with these laws, there can be no assurance that our employees, contractors, or agents will not violate our policies. 29 Table of Contents OUR PRODUCTS ARE SUBJECT TO A LENGTHY AND UNCERTAIN DOMESTIC REGULATORY PROCESS. IF WE DO NOT OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN THE NECESSARY DOMESTIC REGULATORY APPROVALS, WE WILL NOT BE ABLE TO MARKET AND SELL OUR PRODUCTS IN THE UNITED STATES. Our products and operations are subject to extensive regulation in the United States by the FDA. The FDA regulates the research, testing, manufacturing, safety, labeling, storage, record keeping, promotion, distribution and production of medical devices in the United States to ensure that medical products distributed domestically are safe and effective for their intended uses. In order for us to market certain products for use in the United States, we generally must first obtain clearance from the FDA pursuant to Section 510(k) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or FFDCA. Clearance under Section 510(k) requires demonstration that a new device is substantially equivalent to another device with 510(k) clearance or grandfather status. If we significantly modify our products after they receive FDA clearance, the FDA may require us to submit a separate 510(k) or premarket approval application, or PMA, for the modified product before we are permitted to market the products in the United States. In addition, if we develop products in the future that are not considered to be substantially equivalent to a device with 510(k) clearance or grandfather status, we will be required to obtain FDA approval by submitting a PMA. The FDA may not act favorably or quickly in its review of our 510(k) or PMA submissions, or we may encounter significant difficulties and costs in our efforts to obtain FDA clearance or approval, all of which could delay or preclude sale of new products in the United States. Furthermore, the FDA may request additional data or require us to conduct further testing, or compile more data, including clinical data and clinical studies, in support of a 510(k) submission. Regulatory policy affecting our products can change at any time. The changes and their impact on our business cannot be accurately predicted. Changes in the FDA 510(k) process could make approval more difficult to obtain, increase delay, add uncertainty and have other significant adverse effects on our ability to obtain and maintain approval for our products. The FDA may also, instead of accepting a 510(k) submission, require us to submit a PMA, which is typically a much more complex and burdensome application than a 510(k). To support a PMA, the FDA would likely require that we conduct 1 or more clinical studies to demonstrate that the device is safe and effective. We may not be able to meet the requirements to obtain 510(k) clearance or PMA approval, or the FDA may not grant any necessary clearances or approvals. In addition, the FDA may place significant limitations upon the intended use of our products as a condition to a 510(k) clearance or PMA approval. Product applications can also be denied or withdrawn due to failure to comply with regulatory requirements or the occurrence of unforeseen problems following clearance or approval. Any delays or failure to obtain FDA clearance or approvals of new products we develop, any limitations imposed by the FDA on new product use, or the costs of obtaining FDA clearance or approvals could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In order to conduct a clinical investigation involving human subjects for the purpose of demonstrating the safety and effectiveness of a device, a company must, among other things, apply for and obtain Institutional Review Board, or IRB, approval of the proposed investigation. In addition, if the clinical study involves a significant risk (as defined by the FDA) to human health, the sponsor of the investigation must also submit and obtain FDA approval of an investigational device exemption, or IDE, application. Most of our products to date have been considered significant risk devices requiring IDE approval prior to investigational use. We may not be able to obtain FDA and or IRB approval to undertake clinical trials in the United States for any new devices we intend to market in the United States in the future. If we obtain such approvals, we may not be able to comply with the IDE and other regulations governing clinical investigations or the data from any such trials may not support clearance or approval of the investigational device. Failure to obtain such approvals or to comply with such regulations could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 30 Table of Contents COMPLYING WITH FDA REGULATIONS IS A COMPLEX PROCESS, AND OUR FAILURE TO COMPLY FULLY COULD SUBJECT US TO SIGNIFICANT ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS. Because our products, including the da Vinci Surgical System, are commercially distributed, numerous postmarket regulatory requirements apply, including the following Quality System Regulation, or QSR, which requires manufacturers to follow elaborate design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during the manufacturing process; labeling regulations; the FDA general prohibition against false or misleading statements in the labeling or promotion of products for unapproved or off label uses; the Reports of Corrections and Removals regulation, which requires that manufacturers report to the FDA recalls and field corrective actions taken to reduce a risk to health or to remedy a violation of the FFDCA that may pose a risk to health; and the Medical Device Reporting regulation, which requires that manufacturers report to the FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if it were to recur. We are subject to inspection and marketing surveillance by the FDA to determine our compliance with regulatory requirements. If the FDA finds that we have failed to comply, it can institute a wide variety of enforcement actions, ranging from a regulatory letter to a public warning letter to more severe civil and criminal sanctions. Our failure to comply with applicable requirements could lead to an enforcement action that may have an adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. We have modified the labeling, advertising and user training for the da Vinci Surgical System to highlight specific procedures that we believe are within the scope of our existing 510(k) clearances. We cannot assure that the FDA would agree that all such specific procedures are within the scope of the existing general clearance or that we have compiled adequate information to support the safety and efficacy of using the da Vinci Surgical System for all such specific procedures. We also have modified the hardware and software in the da Vinci Surgical System since clearance in ways that we believe do not require new 510(k) clearance. We cannot assure that the FDA would agree with our determinations not to seek new 510(k) clearance for any of these changes. Computer Motion, which we acquired in 2003, also modified the hardware and software in its products subsequent to 510(k) clearance without seeking new clearance. The FDA could impose enforcement sanctions and or require us to obtain 510(k) clearance for any modification to our products or Computer Motion products. We may be prohibited from marketing the modified device until such 510(k) clearance is granted. Our last inspection occurred in July 2010 and the FDA issued a Form FDA 483 listing deficiencies under the QSR relating to complaint handling and manufacturing inspection handling. We later responded to each observation with proposed corrective actions. However, we cannot assure that, upon re inspection, the FDA will find that our corrective actions are appropriate or that they have been adequately implemented. We also cannot assure that the FDA will not find other deficiencies in our compliance with the QSR and other postmarket regulations. OUR PRODUCTS ARE SUBJECT TO VARIOUS INTERNATIONAL REGULATORY PROCESSES AND APPROVAL REQUIREMENTS. IF WE DO NOT OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN THE NECESSARY INTERNATIONAL REGULATORY APPROVALS, WE WILL NOT BE ABLE TO MARKET AND SELL OUR PRODUCTS IN FOREIGN COUNTRIES. To be able to market and sell our products in other countries, we must obtain regulatory approvals and comply with the regulations of those countries. These regulations, including the requirements for approvals and the time required for regulatory review, vary from country to country. Obtaining and maintaining foreign regulatory approvals are complex, and we cannot be certain that we will receive regulatory approvals in any 31 Table of Contents foreign country in which we plan to market our products. If we fail to obtain or maintain regulatory approval in any foreign country in which we plan to market our products, our ability to generate revenue will be harmed. The EU requires that manufacturers of medical products obtain the right to affix the CE mark to their products before selling them in member countries of the EU. The CE mark is an international symbol of adherence to quality assurance standards and compliance with applicable European medical device directives. In order to obtain the right to affix the CE mark to products, a manufacturer must obtain certification that its processes meet certain European quality standards. In January 1999, we received permission to affix the CE mark to our da Vinci Surgical System and EndoWrist instruments. As we modify existing products or develop new products in the future, including new instruments, we currently plan to apply for permission to affix the CE mark to such products. In addition, we will be subject to annual regulatory audits in order to maintain the CE mark permissions we have already obtained. We do not know whether we will be able to obtain permission to affix the CE mark for new or modified products or that we will continue to meet the quality and safety standards required to maintain the permissions we have already received. If we are unable to maintain permission to affix the CE mark to our products, we will no longer be able to sell our products in member countries of the EU, which would have a material adverse effect on our results of operations. In November 2009, we received Shonin approval from the Japanese MHLW for our da Vinci S System and certain of our instruments and accessories for use in certain da Vinci surgical procedures. We may seek additional approvals for other products and or procedures, however, there can be no assurance that such approvals will be granted. In addition, given that only a subset of our instruments have been approved it is possible, depending on surgeon preference, that approved procedures will be adopted slowly or not at all. We are currently focusing efforts on obtaining the appropriate reimbursement approvals for da Vinci procedures in Japan. Sales of our products depend, in part, on the extent to which the costs of our products are reimbursed by governmental health administration authorities. If we are not successful in obtaining the necessary reimbursement approvals or obtaining approvals for future products and procedures, then the demand for our products could be limited. These limitations could eliminate a significant market opportunity for our products in Japan. IF OUR MANUFACTURING FACILITIES DO NOT CONTINUE TO MEET FEDERAL, STATE OR EUROPEAN MANUFACTURING STANDARDS, WE MAY BE REQUIRED TO TEMPORARILY CEASE ALL OR PART OF OUR MANUFACTURING OPERATIONS, WHICH WOULD RESULT IN PRODUCT DELIVERY DELAYS AND LOST REVENUE. Our manufacturing facilities are subject to periodic inspection by regulatory authorities and our operations will continue to be regulated by the FDA for compliance with Good Manufacturing Practice requirements contained in the QSR. We are also required to comply with International Organization for Standardization, or ISO, quality system standards in order to produce products for sale in Europe. If we fail to continue to comply with Good Manufacturing Practice requirements or ISO standards, we may be required to cease all or part of our operations until we comply with these regulations. Our last inspection occurred in July 2010 and the FDA issued a Form FDA 483 listing deficiencies under the QSR relating to complaint handling and manufacturing inspection handling. We later responded to each observation with proposed corrective actions. However, we cannot assure that, upon re inspection, the FDA will find that our corrective actions are appropriate or that they have been adequately implemented. We continue to be subject to FDA inspections at any time. Maintaining such compliance is difficult and costly. We cannot be certain that our facilities will be found to comply with Good Manufacturing Practice requirements or ISO standards in future inspections and audits by regulatory authorities. As required, we are licensed by the State of California to manufacture medical devices. We are subject to periodic inspections by the California Department of Health Services and, if we are unable to maintain this license following any future inspections, we will be unable to manufacture or ship any products, which would have a material adverse effect on our results of operations. 32 Table of Contents RISKS RELATING TO OUR INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY IF WE ARE UNABLE TO REPLACE OUR EXPIRING PATENTS, OUR ABILITY TO COMPETE IN THE MARKET WILL BE HARMED. Some of our patents will begin to expire in 2012 While we will continue to work to add to our patent portfolio to protect the intellectual property contained in our products, we believe new competitors will emerge in medical robotics. We do not know whether we will have the patent protection we need, or whether the protection we do have will be found valid and enforceable if challenged. We also do not know whether we will be able to develop additional patentable proprietary technologies. If we fail to obtain adequate protection of our intellectual property, or if any protection we obtain is reduced or eliminated, others could use our intellectual property without compensating us, resulting in harm to our business. IF WE ARE UNABLE TO PROTECT THE INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY CONTAINED IN OUR PRODUCTS FROM USE BY THIRD PARTIES, OUR ABILITY TO COMPETE IN THE MARKET WILL BE HARMED. Our commercial success will depend in part on obtaining patent and other intellectual property protection for the technologies contained in our products, and on successfully defending our patents and other intellectual property against third party challenges. We will incur substantial costs in obtaining patents and, if necessary, defending our proprietary rights. The patent positions of medical device companies, including ours, can be highly uncertain and involve complex and evolving legal and factual questions. We do not know whether we will obtain the patent protection we seek, or that the protection we do obtain will be found valid and enforceable if challenged. We also do not know whether we will be able to develop additional patentable proprietary technologies. If we fail to obtain adequate protection of our intellectual property, or if any protection we obtain is reduced or eliminated, others could use our intellectual property without compensating us, resulting in harm to our business. We may also determine that it is in our best interests to voluntarily challenge a third party products or patents in litigation or administrative proceedings, including patent interferences or reexaminations. Furthermore, the laws of certain foreign countries do not protect intellectual property rights to the same extent as do the laws of the United States. In addition to patents, we typically rely on a combination of trade secret, copyright and trademark laws, nondisclosure agreements and other contractual provisions and technical security measures to protect our intellectual property rights. Nevertheless, these measures may not be adequate to safeguard the technology underlying our products. If these measures do not protect our rights adequately, third parties could use our technology, and our ability to compete in the market would be reduced. In addition, employees, consultants and others who participate in developing our products may breach their agreements with us regarding our intellectual property, and we may not have adequate remedies for the breach. We also may not be able to effectively protect our intellectual property rights in some foreign countries. For a variety of reasons, we may decide not to file for patent, copyright or trademark protection outside the United States. We also realize that our trade secrets may become known through other means not currently foreseen by us. Notwithstanding our efforts to protect our intellectual property, our competitors may independently develop similar or alternative technologies or products that are equal or superior to our technology and products without infringing any of our intellectual property rights, or may design around our proprietary technologies, which would harm our ability to compete in the market. OTHERS MAY ASSERT THAT OUR PRODUCTS INFRINGE THEIR INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS, WHICH MAY CAUSE US TO ENGAGE IN COSTLY DISPUTES AND, IF WE ARE NOT SUCCESSFUL IN DEFENDING OURSELVES, COULD ALSO CAUSE US TO PAY SUBSTANTIAL DAMAGES AND PROHIBIT US FROM SELLING OUR PRODUCTS. There may be United States and foreign patents issued to third parties that relate to computer assisted surgery, remote surgery, and minimally invasive surgery. Some of these patents may be broad enough to cover 33 Table of Contents 1 or more aspects of our present technology, and may cover aspects of our future technology. We do not know whether any of these patents, if challenged, would be held valid, enforceable and infringed. From time to time, we receive, and likely will continue to receive, letters from third parties inviting us to license their patents. We may be sued by, or become involved in an administrative proceeding with, 1 or more of these third parties. We cannot assure that a court or administrative body would agree with any arguments or defenses we may have concerning invalidity, unenforceability or non infringement of any third party patent. In addition to the issued patents of which we are aware, other parties may have filed, and in the future are likely to file, patent applications covering surgical products that are similar or identical to ours. We cannot assure that any patents issuing from applications filed by a third party will not cover our products or will not have priority over our patent applications. The medical device industry has been characterized by extensive litigation and administrative proceedings regarding patents and other intellectual property rights, and companies have employed such actions to gain a competitive advantage. If third parties assert infringement or other intellectual property claims against us, our technical and management personnel will experience a significant diversion of time and effort and we will incur large expenses defending our company. If third parties in any patent action are successful, our patent portfolio may be damaged, we may have to pay substantial damages, including treble damages, and we may be required to stop selling our products or obtain a license which, if available at all, may require us to pay substantial royalties. We cannot be certain that we will have the financial resources or the substantive arguments to defend our patents from infringement or claims of invalidity or unenforceability, or to defend against allegations of infringement of third party patents. In addition, any public announcements related to litigation or administrative proceedings initiated by us, or initiated or threatened against us, could cause our stock price to decline. OUR PRODUCTS RELY ON LICENSES FROM THIRD PARTIES, AND IF WE LOSE ACCESS TO THESE TECHNOLOGIES, OUR REVENUES COULD DECLINE. We rely on technology that we license from others, including technology that is integral to our products. We have entered into license agreements with several industry partners. Any of these agreements may be terminated for breach. If any of these agreements are terminated, we may be unable to reacquire the necessary license on satisfactory terms, or at all. The loss or failure to maintain these licenses could prevent or delay further development or commercialization of our products, which would have a material adverse effect on our results of operations. RISKS RELATING TO OUR TRADING MARKETS OUR FUTURE OPERATING RESULTS MAY BE BELOW SECURITIES ANALYSTS OR INVESTORS EXPECTATIONS, WHICH COULD CAUSE OUR STOCK PRICE TO DECLINE. Due to the nascent nature of our industry, we have limited insight into trends that may emerge in our market and affect our business. The revenue and income potential of our market are unproven, and we may be unable to continue to generate significant revenues. Our products typically have a lengthy sales cycle. In addition, our costs may be higher than we anticipated. If we fail to generate sufficient revenues or our costs are higher than we expect, our results of operations will suffer. Further, future revenue from sales of our products is difficult to forecast because the market for new surgical technologies is still evolving. Our results of operations will depend upon numerous factors, including the extent to which our products gain market acceptance; actions relating to regulatory matters; our timing and ability to develop our manufacturing and sales and marketing capabilities; demand for our products; 34 Table of Contents the size and timing of particular sales and any collection delays related to those sales; product quality and supply problems; the progress of surgical training in the use of our products; our ability to develop, introduce and market new or enhanced versions of our products on a timely basis; third party payor reimbursement policies; our ability to protect our proprietary rights and defend against third party challenges; our ability to license additional intellectual property rights; and the progress and results of clinical trials. Our operating results in any particular period will not be a reliable indication of our future performance. It is likely that in some future quarters, our operating results will be below the expectations of securities analysts or investors. If this occurs, the price of our common stock, and the value of your investment, will likely decline. OUR STOCK PRICE HAS BEEN, AND WILL LIKELY CONTINUE TO BE, VOLATILE. The market price of our common stock has experienced fluctuations and is likely to fluctuate significantly in the future. For example, during fiscal 2009, the NASDAQ closing price of 1 share of our common stock reached a high of $306.58 and a low of $85.33 and during fiscal 2010, it reached a high of $388.01 and a low of $247.50. Our stock price can fluctuate for a number of reasons, including announcements about us or our competitors; quarterly variations in operating results; introduction or abandonment of new technologies or products; regulatory approvals; changes in product pricing policies; changes in earnings estimates by analysts or changes in accounting policies; economic changes and overall market volatility; and political uncertainties. In addition, stock markets have experienced significant price and volume volatility in the past, especially recently. This volatility has had a substantial effect on the market prices of securities of many public companies for reasons frequently unrelated or disproportionate to the operating performance of the specific companies. In addition, the securities of many medical device companies, including Intuitive Surgical, have historically been subject to extensive price and volume fluctuations that may affect the market price of their common stock. If these broad market fluctuations continue, they may adversely affect the market price of our common stock. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS N1 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
